California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) “Seller of travel discount program” means a membership, benefit program, or other arrangement that purports to entitle the purchaser of the seller of travel discount program to future transportation or any travel services at a discount or reduced price or preferential treatment not made generally available to the public. Seller of travel discount program does not include a “travel
 business discount program” as defined in Section 17550.26.

(2) “Seller” means any person who sells or offers for sale a seller of travel discount program but does not include any of the following:

(A) Any person excluded from the definition of “seller of travel” under subdivision (b) of Section 17550.1.

(B) An owner, developer, or operator of a time-share interest or time-share plan as described in subdivisions (x) and (z) of Section 11212 in connection with an offer as described in subdivision (o) of Section 11212 that complies with the Vacation Ownership and Time-Share Act of 2004 providing lodging at a time-share unit, including arranging transportation to the time-share unit.

(C) An exchange company as described in subdivision (k) of Section 11212
 in connection with arranging lodging at a time-share unit, including arranging transportation to the time-share unit.

(D) A motor club subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(E) A nonprofit organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that, according to a final ruling or determination by the Internal Revenue Service, is both exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and not a private foundation as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code. An advance ruling or determination of tax-exempt or foundation status by the Internal Revenue Service does not meet the requirements of this paragraph.

(F) An entity or a wholly owned subsidiary of an entity that maintains a tangible net equity exceeding five million
 dollars ($5,000,000) as reflected in an audited financial statement, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, for the entity’s most recent fiscal year.

(b) A seller may sell a seller of travel discount program if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The seller is a duly registered seller of travel.

(2) The annual charge for the seller of travel discount program does not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(3) The term of the seller of travel discount program does not exceed one year. The purchaser may renew participation in the program at the end of each term for a period not to exceed one year by affirmatively providing the seller with a written express request to renew. The seller may not seek or accept the
 purchaser’s authorization for an automatic renewal or the purchaser’s renewal request more than 60 days before the expiration of an annual term or more than 15 days before the expiration of a shorter term program.

(4) The represented discounts or reduced prices offered under the seller of travel discount program are not made generally available to the public.

(5) The purchaser has the right to cancel the purchaser’s participation in the seller of travel discount program and receive a full refund of all consideration paid for the pending term of the program at either of the following times:

(A) Within five business days of purchasing or renewing the seller of travel discount program or receiving the disclosure required by paragraph (6), whichever is later.

(B) At any time based on the seller’s misrepresentation or violation of this article.

(6) The benefits and limitations of the seller of travel discount program and the purchaser’s cancellation rights described in paragraph (5) are clearly and conspicuously disclosed, in writing, before any consideration is paid by the purchaser.

(7) The discounted or reduced price for any tour package, including transportation or any travel services, offered under the seller of travel discount program shall be at least 5 percent below the price that would have been paid by a purchaser without participation in the seller of travel discount program.

(8) The seller may not offer to arrange transportation or any travel services for a specified price, time, or location unless the seller has written evidence of the commitment
 of the provider of transportation, lodging, or any travel services to provide those services at the price, time, and location specified.

(9) The seller shall maintain a surety bond of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state. A copy of the bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State, with a copy provided to the Attorney General. The bond shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of purchasers of the seller of travel discount program harmed by a violation of this section, the seller’s misrepresentation or misapplication of funds, or the failure of the seller to comply with the terms of the seller of travel discount program.

(10) The seller shall comply with the requirements for discount buying services pursuant to Title 2.6 (commencing with Section 1812.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.30.

(a) The Travel Seller Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All fines, penalties, and fees, including late fees, collected pursuant to this article, and any moneys collected for a violation of this article or Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35), shall be deposited in the fund, and the moneys in the fund may be expended only for the purposes specified in this article.

(b) All moneys paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Travel Seller Fund shall
 be used by the Department of Justice in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this article, including, but not limited to, the payment of salaries of Department of Justice personnel, contractors, or consultants, and the dissemination of information, including consumer education regarding this article and Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35).

(c) The sum of three hundred ninety-five thousand dollars ($395,000) is hereby appropriated from the Travel Seller Fund to the Department of Justice for purposes of the Sellers of Travel Program established pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 17550).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Travel Consumer Restitution Plan [17550.35. - 17550.58.]

17550.35.

“Restitution corporation” means the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.36.

“Participant,” as used in this article, means a seller of travel, as defined in Section 17550.7, who is registered pursuant to Section 17550.20.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.37.

(a) “Person aggrieved,” as used in this article, means a passenger, as defined in Section 17550.3, located in California at the time of sale, or a person located in California at the time of sale who made any payment on behalf of the passenger for air or sea transportation or travel services, who has sustained a loss as a result of the failure of a seller of travel to refund payments made by or on behalf of a passenger as payment for air or sea transportation or travel services, where a refund is due as a result of the bankruptcy, insolvency, cessation of operations, or material failure to provide the transportation or travel services purchased by the passenger, regardless of whether the passenger or a person making
 payment on behalf of the passenger initially contracted with that seller of travel. “Loss,” as used herein, shall be limited to losses that are incurred in a transaction with a seller of travel who, at the time of sale, was registered pursuant to Section 17550.20, and who had been a paid participant at any time during the period commencing with 18 months previous to the time of sale, and ending with the expiration of the applicable time period provided in law for the filing of a civil, administrative, or other available action under the law that is available to the person aggrieved. “Person aggrieved” shall not mean or include a passenger, or person making payment on behalf of a passenger, in a transaction where the air or sea transportation or travel services are furnished by a business entity that is located and providing transportation or travel services outside of the United States and is not
 in compliance with Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 17550).

(b) Any person aggrieved who files a claim for payment from the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund thereby waives his or her right to bring any action at law or equity that is against the seller of travel as to whom the claim is made and arises from the transaction that is the subject of the claim against the restitution fund. The claim form required by Section 17550.46 shall include a clear and conspicuous notice of the waiver.

(c) The waiver of rights provided for by subdivision (b) shall not apply to any claimant whose claim is denied on any of the following grounds, as set forth in the statement of decision required by subdivision (d) of Section 17550.47:

(1) The seller of travel had not been a paid-up participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund at any time during the period of time provided in subdivision (a).

(2) The seller of travel was not, at the time of sale, registered pursuant to Section 17550.20.

(3) The claimant was not located in California at the time of sale, as required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 517, Sec. 4.   (AB 2106)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.38.

(a) It is the purpose of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation to provide restitution to a person aggrieved, subject to the limitations set forth in this article. The restitution is secondary only to any relief, compensation, or reimbursement to which a person aggrieved may be entitled under any of the following:

(1) A Consumer Protection Deposit Plan, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 17550.16.

(2) A Consumer Protection Escrow Plan, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 17550.16.

(3) Travel insurance.

(4) The successful assertion by the person aggrieved of that person’s rights under Section 1747.50 or 1747.90 of the Civil Code or under Section 226.12 or 226.13 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person aggrieved to bring a civil action to obtain any relief, compensation, or reimbursement or to file a crime report with law enforcement in order to obtain payment from the restitution fund.

(c) The restitution shall be paid from the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund established by the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation.

(d) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation may request legal counsel, representation, and advice from the office of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.39.

(a) Participants shall maintain a corporation under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) operating under the name “Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation.”

(b) The State of California and any of its officers, agents, or employees shall not be liable in any manner for any act or omission of Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation, its directors, officers, agents, or
 employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.40.

Each participant is required to comply with the provisions of this article and shall abide by the rules and decisions of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation adopted in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.41.

(a) The Board of Directors of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall be composed of six directors, as follows:

(1) One public consumer representative member appointed by the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(2) One employee of the Department of Justice, assigned by the office of the Attorney General, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member.

(3) Four directors who are participants in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund.

(b) The director appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall serve until the appointment is revoked or another appointment is made, or until the director resigns.

(c) Participant directors shall be elected by a balloting of all participants in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund in an election to be conducted by the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation in February of each year. Participant directors shall be elected to serve two-year terms, with two of the four participant directors being elected each year to staggered two-year terms.

(d) A person is eligible to be nominated and to serve as a participant director if the person satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) The person’s primary occupation, at the time of nomination and continuously during the previous three years, has been as the owner or manager of a seller of travel that is and has been in good standing both as a registered seller of travel and as a participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund.

(2) The person has not been convicted of a crime, including a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.

(3) The person is not subject to a judgment or administrative order, whether entered after adjudication or stipulation, predicated on that person’s commission of an act of dishonesty, fraud, deceit, or violation of this chapter or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7.

(4) The person is not
 a defendant in a pending criminal or civil law enforcement action brought by a public prosecutor.

(5) The person has not served as a participant director of the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund at any time during the previous 18 months.

(6) Within five days after the end of the nomination period, the person nominated to be a director submits an application to the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund, signed under penalty of perjury, that attests to the person’s satisfaction of all of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive.

(e) The Travel Consumer Restitution Fund may not impose requirements for nomination to be a participant director in addition to the requirements described in subdivision (d).

(f) If a nominee does not satisfy the
 requirements of subdivision (d), the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund shall notify the nominee and the Attorney General in writing, within 30 days of the nominee’s application, that the person has been rejected as a nominee and the specific grounds for the rejection.

(g) The nomination period shall be open for the period beginning 90 days and ending 30 days before the election. Any participant may nominate for election any participant who is eligible to serve as provided in subdivision (d).

(h) The Travel Consumer Restitution Fund shall enable nominees to submit, within 21 days before the election, written statements of up to 500 words in a reasonable format concerning their candidacy and shall mail those statements to participants in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund and make those statements publicly available no later than 14 days before the election by means that may
 include disseminating the information on an Internet Web site or providing the information by electronic mail to any person who has requested the information and provided a valid electronic mail address.

(i) A director who does not qualify to be a participant or who otherwise becomes unable to serve shall not continue to serve as director. The board of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall adopt rules setting forth the procedures to determine that a director is no longer able to serve as a director and for the board to elect a successor to serve as director until the next election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 196, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.42.

The fiscal year of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall commence on July 1 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.42.5.

(a) Within 30 days of the close of the fiscal year or other reasonable period established by the board of directors, the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall make publicly available a statement of the following information concerning the most recently concluded fiscal year:

(1) The number of claims and approximate dollar amount of the claims received.

(2) The total number of claims and total dollar amount of claims paid.

(3) The approximate number and dollar amount of claims denied or abandoned.

(4) The dollar balance in the restitution fund.

(5) The amount of assessments received from participants and the operating and administrative costs and expenses of the corporation.

(6) The number of new participants and the amount of assessments received from them.

(b) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall make publicly available within 15 days of the board of directors’ approval, or other reasonable period established by the board of directors, the following information:

(1) The approved minutes of meetings of the board of directors.

(2) The approved estimated annual operational budget projecting the costs of
 operations and administration for the succeeding fiscal year, excluding the amount to be paid for claims.

(3) The approved bylaws, as amended, of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation.

(c) Information may be made publicly available as required by this section by disseminating the information on an Internet Web site or providing the information by electronic mail to any person who has requested the information and provided a valid electronic mail address.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 17550.42 (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 196, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 17.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.43.

(a) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall establish and maintain an operations fund for the payment of costs of operations and administration. The corporation shall prepare, before its fiscal year end, an estimated annual operational budget projecting the costs of operations and administration for the succeeding fiscal year, excluding the amount paid for claims.

(b) (1) All participants making their initial payment of assessments shall pay to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation an initial, one-time seventy-five dollar ($75) assessment per location from which the participant does business in the state in order to provide additional funding for the operations of the corporation, as
 those operations are authorized by the corporation’s board of directors.

(2) All participants making their initial payment of assessments shall pay to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation an initial, one-time two hundred dollar ($200) assessment per location from which the participant does business in this state in order to provide additional funding for the restitution fund.

(c) All participants who were sellers of travel in any year, and who did not pay a Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation assessment in that year shall, when making a payment of assessment in a subsequent year, pay the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation all assessments for the operations of the corporation and the restitution fund for the years in which they were in business as were billed and paid by participants in those years.

(d) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall establish a restitution fund for the payment of claims. All claims shall be paid from the restitution fund.

(1) The restitution fund shall be in the form of a trust account maintained in the State of California with a federally insured bank that shall be selected by the Board of Directors of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation and shall be approved by the office of the Attorney General. The Board of Directors of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation or its delegate shall serve as trustee.

(2) The restitution fund shall meet the following criteria:

(A) The trustee shall deposit all restitution funds received into the trust account.

(B) The trustee shall maintain a separate
 accounting for disbursements and collections on account of claims against each participant. Quarterly reports shall be provided to the office of the Attorney General, Consumer Protection Section.

(C) The trustee shall disburse funds from the trust as directed by the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation pursuant to Section 17550.47.

(D) The trustee may only invest the operations fund and trust funds in any of the securities described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 8.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.44.

(a) In addition to the assessments required by Section 17550.43, the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall bill and collect from each participant an annual assessment that in the aggregate shall consist of assessments for the operations fund and the restitution fund. For each participant, the due date of that annual assessment shall be 30 days prior to the annual renewal date for registration pursuant to Section 17550.20 or 45 days after billing, whichever is later. For a participant registering for the first time, the assessments required by Section 17550.43 shall be due 10 days prior to the seller of travel doing business in this state. A late fee of five dollars ($5) per day, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500), shall be paid
 for each day after the due date specified in this section until the assessment is paid.

(b) The annual assessment for the operations fund shall be determined no later than January 15 of each year for the next fiscal year in an amount that does not exceed the amount necessary to fund the operations and administration of the corporation, based upon the annual operational budget required by subdivision (a) of Section 17550.43, and shall become effective immediately. The annual assessment for the operations fund shall not exceed sixty dollars ($60) per year for each location in the state from which a participant does business. The
 corporation may increase the maximum amount of this assessment no more than once per fiscal year in an amount not to exceed any one-year increase in the California Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding year as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) If, as of January 15 of any year, the balance in the restitution fund is less than one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000), the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall make an assessment of participants, up to a maximum amount of two hundred dollars ($200) for each location in the state from which a participant does business, to bring the restitution fund to an expected balance of one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000). Every participant’s assessment shall be determined pro rata
 based upon the ratio of the number of locations in the state from which the participant does business to the total number of locations for all participants as of the preceding December 15.

(d) If, on May 1 or October 15 of any year, the balance in the restitution fund is less than nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000), the corporation shall make an emergency assessment of participants, not more than twice per year, up to a maximum amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per year for each location in the state from which the participant does business, for deposit in the trust account to return the level of the restitution fund to an expected balance of one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000). The corporation shall estimate the total cost of billing, collecting, and processing the emergency restitution fund assessment and
 shall assess and collect, together with the emergency restitution fund assessment, an emergency operations fund assessment that is in the aggregate sufficient to offset the estimated cost. Each participant’s assessments shall be determined pro rata based upon the ratio of the number of locations in the state from which the participant does business to the total number of locations for all participants as of the first day of the preceding month. The board of directors shall adopt rules for the notification of emergency assessments.

(e) In addition to the assessments required by Section 17550.43 and subdivision (d), if at any time during the fiscal year the board of directors of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation determines that the operations fund will be insufficient to pay the costs of operations and administration for the
 current or next fiscal year, the corporation, as determined by the board of directors, shall do either or both of the following:

(1) Make an emergency assessment of participants, not more than once per fiscal year, up to a maximum amount of sixty-five dollars ($65) per year for each location in the state from which a participant does business. The emergency assessment may be billed and collected either on an emergency basis from all participants upon the making of the assessment, or in conjunction with each participant’s annual assessment pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Transfer any or all interest earned on the Restitution Fund to the Operations Fund, provided that no transfer results in a restitution fund balance of less than one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000).

(f) The assessment required by subdivision (d) or (e) shall be due 45 days from the date the bill for that assessment is sent to the seller of travel by the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation. A late fee of five dollars ($5) per day, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500), shall be paid for each day after the due date specified in this section until the assessment is paid.

(g) The Travel Consumer Restitution Fund shall report to the office of the Attorney General each levy of assessment within 10 business days after the levy.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (AB 1758)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.44.

(a) In addition to the assessments required by Section 17550.43, the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall bill and collect from each participant an annual assessment that in the aggregate shall consist of assessments for the operations fund and the restitution fund. For each participant, the due date of that annual assessment shall be 30 days prior to the annual renewal date for registration pursuant to Section 17550.20 or 45 days after billing, whichever is later. For a participant registering for the first time, the assessments required by Section 17550.43 shall be due 10 days prior to the seller of travel doing business in this state. A late fee of five dollars ($5) per day, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500), shall be paid for each day after the due date specified in this section until the
 assessment is paid.

(b) The annual assessment for the operations fund shall be determined no later than January 15 of each year for the next fiscal year in an amount that does not exceed the amount necessary to fund the operations and administration of the corporation, based upon the annual operational budget required by subdivision (a) of Section 17550.43, and shall become effective immediately. The annual assessment for the operations fund shall not exceed seventy dollars ($70) per year for each location in the state from which a participant does business. The corporation may increase the maximum amount of this assessment no more than once per fiscal year in an amount not to exceed any one-year increase in the California Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding year as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) If, as of January 15 of any
 year, the balance in the restitution fund is less than one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000), the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall make an assessment of participants, up to a maximum amount of two hundred dollars ($200) for each location in the state from which a participant does business, to bring the restitution fund to an expected balance of one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000). Every participant’s assessment shall be determined pro rata based upon the ratio of the number of locations in the state from which the participant does business to the total number of locations for all participants as of the preceding December 15.

(d) If, on May 1 or October 15 of any year, the balance in the restitution fund is less than nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000), the corporation shall make an emergency assessment of participants, not more than twice per year, up to a maximum amount of one hundred fifty
 dollars ($150) per year for each location in the state from which the participant does business, for deposit in the trust account to return the level of the restitution fund to an expected balance of one million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000). The corporation shall estimate the total cost of billing, collecting, and processing the emergency restitution fund assessment and shall assess and collect, together with the emergency restitution fund assessment, an emergency operations fund assessment that is in the aggregate sufficient to offset the estimated cost. Each participant’s assessments shall be determined pro rata based upon the ratio of the number of locations in the state from which the participant does business to the total number of locations for all participants as of the first day of the preceding month. The board of directors shall adopt rules for the notification of emergency assessments.

(e) In addition to the assessments
 required by Section 17550.43 and subdivision (d), if at any time during the fiscal year the board of directors of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation determines that the operations fund will be insufficient to pay the costs of operations and administration for the current or next fiscal year, the corporation, as determined by the board of directors, shall do either or both of the following:

(1) Make an emergency assessment of participants, not more than once per fiscal year, up to a maximum amount of sixty-five dollars ($65) per year for each location in the state from which a participant does business. The emergency assessment may be billed and collected either on an emergency basis from all participants upon the making of the assessment, or in conjunction with each participant’s annual assessment pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Transfer any or all interest earned on the
 Restitution Fund to the Operations Fund, provided that no transfer results in a restitution fund balance of less than one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000).

(f) The assessment required by subdivision (d) or (e) shall be due 45 days from the date the bill for that assessment is sent to the seller of travel by the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation. A late fee of five dollars ($5) per day, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500), shall be paid for each day after the due date specified in this section until the assessment is paid.

(g) The Travel Consumer Restitution Fund shall report to the office of the Attorney General each levy of assessment within 10 business days after the levy.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2031.

(History: Repealed in (Sec.1) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   (AB 1758)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.45.

(a) If any assessment is not paid within 60 days of the due date, then the corporation shall notify the office of the Attorney General, which shall forthwith suspend the registration of the participant who has not paid. The corporation shall provide a copy of this notification to the participant.

(b) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation or any entity set forth in Section 17204 may bring an action at law or in equity against a participant to recover any unpaid
 assessment.

(c) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorney’s fees if it prevails in any action against a participant pursuant to subdivision (b). Those costs and attorney’s fees shall be awarded as an item of costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.46.

(a) The Attorney General or his or her delegate shall approve any claim form which shall be provided to a person aggrieved by the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation to be submitted by a person aggrieved in order to obtain payment from the restitution fund. The claim form shall require the person aggrieved to provide the corporation with information which is sufficient to decide whether payment is to be made to that person. The information must include all of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the person aggrieved.

(2) The date, form, and amount of each payment and evidence thereof.

(3) The amount of the claim and specific basis therefor.

(4) Any written agreements, correspondence, or other documentation relevant to the transaction and to the transportation or travel services which were purchased and not provided.

(5) Identification of the transportation or travel services which were purchased and not provided.

(6) Description of any payment or reimbursement or alternative transportation or travel services received by the person aggrieved for the transportation or purchased travel services which were not provided.

(b) If any required information is unavailable to the person aggrieved, the person shall so state in the claim form, explaining why the information is unavailable. The corporation may require any other additional information as may be necessary to decide the claim. Failure to provide any required information or documentation or an adequate explanation as to why the information is unavailable shall constitute grounds for denial of a claim.

(c) The person aggrieved who submits a claim form shall sign the form stating, under penalty of perjury pursuant to the laws of the State of California, that the information contained in the form and any statements by the person making the claim submitted therewith are true and correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.47.

(a) (1) Any person aggrieved who suffers a loss of more than fifty dollars ($50) of amounts paid for air or sea transportation or travel services may file a claim with the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation by filing a claim form as required by Section 17550.46 and paying, by check or money order, a processing fee to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation in the amount of thirty-five dollars ($35). Any check for the processing fee that is returned unpaid to the corporation by the
 financial institution upon which it is drawn shall be returned to the claimant and the claim shall be rejected for filing. Any claimant whose claim is rejected may resubmit his or her claim upon payment of a processing fee of fifty dollars ($50).

(2) Any processing fee required by paragraph (1) shall be nonrefundable except where (A) a claim is denied on the basis as set forth in the statement of decision that either the seller of travel, at the time of sale, was not a participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund or the seller of travel was not registered, or (B) the claim is granted in whole or in part. In either case, the processing fee shall be refunded to the person aggrieved upon denial or upon payment of the claim, whichever is applicable.

(3) In no event shall a person aggrieved have more than one year after the scheduled date of completion of travel within which to
 file a claim with the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund.

(b) A person aggrieved may recover from the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund an amount not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per person aggrieved, not to exceed the amount paid to the participant by or on behalf of the person aggrieved for the transportation or travel services. Payments from the restitution fund shall be limited to restitution for sums paid for transportation or travel services and shall not include any other amounts, including, but not limited to, payment for lost wages, pain and suffering, emotional distress, travel insurance, lost luggage, or any consequential damages. The person aggrieved shall not be entitled to receive attorney’s fees in connection with a filed claim or on appeal.

(c) All claims are to be decided on the written record before the corporation, with no hearing to be held. The
 record shall consist of a fully executed and complete claim form, any other documentation submitted by the claimant or the participant, and any documents or reports submitted by staff or the designated representative of the office of the Attorney General. Claims are to be decided within 45 days of receipt unless (1) the designated representative of the office of the Attorney General requests a continuance to obtain and submit information, or (2) the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation determines that additional information or documentation is required to decide the claim. In either case, the claim shall be decided within 45 days of receipt of all additional information or documentation. A claim not decided timely shall be deemed granted.

(d) Whenever the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation denies a claim in whole or in part, it shall provide to the claimant a written statement of decision setting forth the factual and legal basis for
 the denial.

(e) A claimant may request reconsideration of an adverse decision of the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation by mailing a written request, accompanied by a processing fee of fifty dollars ($50) paid by check or money order, within 20 days of the date a notice of denial and statement of decision was mailed to the claimant. Any check for the processing fee that is returned unpaid to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation by the financial institution upon which it is drawn shall be returned to the claimant and the request for reconsideration shall not be determined until the claimant has paid the fifty dollar ($50) processing fee.
